Washington statutes.
RCW 7.48.210

Civil action, who may maintain.

A private person may maintain a civil action for a public nuisance, if it is specially injurious to himself or herself but not otherwise.

[ 2011 c 336 s 218; Code 1881 s 1243; 1875 p 80 s 9; RRS s 9921.]